Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1306
Unclean stock cars, railroads bringing into state; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any railroad company operating its road in this state to bring or cause to be brought into this state from an adjoining state any empty car used for transporting hogs or sheep, or any empty combination car used for carrying grain and stock that has any filth of any kind whatever in the same; but such railroad company shall, before it allows such car or cars to pass into the state, cause the same to be thoroughly cleaned. Any person or persons or corporation violating any provision of this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 290.